Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1202
Definitions, where found.

For the purposes of the State Boat Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 37-1203 to 37-1210 shall be used.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 195, § 1;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 100;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 3.